Washington statutes.
RCW 43.384.030

Board of directors—Membership—Advisory committee—Procedures.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5492-S.SL) ***

(1) The authority must be governed by a board of directors. The board of directors must consist of:

(a) Two members and two alternates from the house of representatives, with one member and one alternate appointed from each of the two major caucuses of the house of representatives by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(b) Two members and two alternates from the senate, with one member and one alternate appointed from each of the two major caucuses of the senate by the president of the senate; and

(c) Nine representatives with expertise in the tourism industry and related businesses including, but not limited to, hotel, restaurant, outdoor recreation, attractions, retail, and rental car businesses appointed by the governor.

(2) The initial membership of the authority must be appointed as follows:

(a) By May 1, 2018, the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate must each submit to the governor a list of ten nominees who are not legislators or employees of the state or its political subdivisions, with no caucus submitting the same nominee;

(b) The nominations from the speaker of the house of representatives must include at least one representative from the restaurant industry; one representative from the rental car industry; and one representative from the retail industry;

(c) The nominations from the president of the senate must include at least one representative from the hotel industry; one representative from the attractions industry; and one representative from the outdoor recreation industry; and

(d) The remaining member appointed by the governor must have a demonstrated expertise in the tourism industry.

(3) By July 1, 2018, the governor must appoint four members from each list submitted by the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate under subsection (2)(a) through (c) of this section and one member under subsection (2)(d) of this section. Appointments by the governor must reflect diversity in geography, size of business, gender, and ethnicity. No county may have more than two appointments and no city may have more than one appointment.

(4) There must be a nonvoting advisory committee to the board. The advisory committee must consist of:

(a) One ex officio representative from the department, state parks and recreation commission, department of transportation, and other state agencies as the authority deems appropriate; and

(b) One member from a federally recognized Indian tribe appointed by the director of the department.

(5) The initial appointments under subsections (1) and (2) of this section must be appointed by the governor to terms as follows: Four members for two-year terms; four members for three-year terms; and five members for four-year terms, which must include the chair. After the initial appointments, all appointments must be for four years.

(6) The board must select from its membership the chair of the board and such other officers as it deems appropriate. The chair of the board must be a member from the tourism industry or related businesses.

(7) A majority of the board constitutes a quorum.

(8) The board must create its own bylaws in accordance with the laws of the state of Washington.

(9) Any member of the board may be removed for misfeasance, malfeasance, or willful neglect of duty after notice and a public hearing, unless the notice and hearing are expressly waived in writing by the affected member.

(10) If a vacancy occurs on the board, a replacement must be appointed for the unexpired term.

(11) The members of the board serve without compensation but are entitled to reimbursement, solely from the funds of the authority, for expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties.

(12) The board must meet at least quarterly.

(13) No board member of the authority may serve on the board of an organization that could be considered for a contract authorized under RCW 43.384.050.

[ 2018 c 275 s 4.]